Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.060

Foreign nationals—Contribution certification. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) Each candidate or political committee that has accepted a contribution, and each out-of-state committee that has accepted a contribution reportable under RCW 29B.25.110, from a partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of persons must receive a certification from each contributor that:

(a) The contribution is not financed in any part by a foreign national; and

(b) Foreign nationals are not involved in making decisions regarding the contribution in any way.

(2) The certifications must be maintained for a period of no less than three years after the date of the applicable election.

(3) At the request of the commission, each candidate or committee required to comply with subsection (1) of this section must provide to the commission copies of the certifications maintained under this section.

[ 2024 c 164 s 448; 2020 c 152 s 10. Formerly RCW 42.17A.418.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Findings—Local regulations not preempted—2020 c 152: See notes following RCW 29B.40.050.